Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.023

Associations with same objective—Dual membership—Contracting.

Any board member of the commission may be a member or officer of an association that has the same objectives for which the commission was formed. The commission may contract with the association for services necessary to carry out any purposes authorized under this chapter if an appropriate written contract has been entered into.

[ 2002 c 313 s 101.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.